test/src/morphology/V-vaktw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - vakţõ: # Verb 31 'eng /est valvata/fin' - full paradigm
     vakţõ+V+Inf: vakţõ
     vakţõ+V+Ger: vakţõs
     vakţõ+V+Sup: vakţõm
     vakţõ+V+Sup+Ine: vakţõmõs
     vakţõ+V+Sup+Ela: vakţõmõst
     vakţõ+V+Sup+Tra: vakţõmõks
     vakţõ+V+Sup+Abe: vakţõmõt
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vakţūb
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vakţõt
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vakţūbõd
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vakţīz
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vakţīzt, vakţīztõ]
     vakţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vakţīzt, vakţīztõ]
     vakţõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: vakţ
     vakţõ+V+Cond+Sg3: vakţõks
     vakţõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vakţ
     vakţõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: vakţ
     vakţõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vakţõgid
     vakţõ+V+Jus+Sg3: vakţõg
     vakţõ+V+Quo+Sg3: vakţiji
     vakţõ+V+ActPrfPrc: vakţõn
     vakţõ+V+PssPrfPrc: vakţõd
